Iowa, session 2025-2026, SF360.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 2637XS (2) 91 as/js S.F. 360 Section 1. NEW SECTION . 727.13 Administration of gene-based 1 vaccines. 2 1. A person shall not provide or administer a gene-based 3 vaccine to another person in this state. 4 2. A person who violates this section is guilty of a simple 5 misdemeanor and is subject to a fine of five hundred dollars 6 per incident. 7 3. The appropriate licensing board within the department of 8 inspections, appeals, and licensing shall review the license of 9 a person licensed under chapter 147 who violates this section. 10 4. For purposes of this section, âgene-based vaccineâ 11 means a vaccine developed using messenger ribonucleic acid 12 technology, modified messenger ribonucleic acid technology, 13 self-amplifying messenger ribonucleic acid technology, or 14 deoxyribonucleic acid technology. 15